District of Columbia statutes.
5-563.02

Freeze of current rate for locality-based comparability adjustments.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including the Law Enforcement Pay Equity Act of 2000 or any provision of law amended by the Law Enforcement Pay Equity Act of 2000, no officer or member of the United States Secret Service Uniformed Division or the United States Park Police may be paid locality pay under section 5304 or section 5304a of title 5, United States Code , at a percentage rate for the applicable locality in excess of the rate in effect for pay periods during calendar year 2000.

History

Dec. 21, 2000, 114 Stat. 2763, Pub. L. 106-554, title IX, § 902(b)

Editor's Notes

This section was enacted as part of the Law Enforcement Pay Equity Act of 2000 (Dec. 21, 2000, 114 Stat. 2763, Pub. L. 106-554, title IX, § 902(b)).